test/tools/spellcheckers/speller-gt-norm-yamls/basespellertests_speller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../../tools/spellcheckers/generator-speller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/analyser-speller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../../tools/spellcheckers/generator-speller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/analyser-speller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Normativity tests: # We should not generate non-standard or irrelevant forms:
    abrodh+V+IV+PrfPrc:                    "obr>eme"
    abrodh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:               "obr>e"
    hojjedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:              "håjj>a"
    laakan+Adv:                            "laakan"
    snaare+A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Com: [ snaerie>b»odtj>ine, snaere>b»odtj>ine, snaerie>b»adtj>ine, snaere>b»adtj>ine ]
    unnies+A+Sg+Gen:                       "unnie>n"
